src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
! Masculine lexica
! ================

LEXICON PAN
PAN_SG ;
PAN_PL ;

LEXICON PAN_SG
+N+Msc: NOM_0 ;
+N+Msc: GEN_A ;
+N+Msc: DAT_OVI ;
+N+Msc: DAT_U ;
+N+Msc: ACC_A ;
+N+Msc: VOC_E ;
+N+Msc: LOC_OVI ;
+N+Msc: LOC_U ;
+N+Msc: IST_EM ;

LEXICON PAN_PL
+N+Msc: NOMPL_OVE ;
+N+Msc: NOMPL_I ;
+N+Msc: GENPL_U ;
+N+Msc: DATPL_UM ;
+N+Msc: ACCPL_Y ;
+N+Msc: VOCPL_OVE ;
+N+Msc: VOCPL_I ;
+N+Msc: LOCPL_ECH ;
+N+Msc: ISTPL_Y ;

LEXICON HRAD
HRAD_SG ;
HRAD_PL ;

LEXICON HRAD_SG
+N+Msc: NOM_0 ;
+N+Msc: GEN_U ;
+N+Msc: DAT_U ;
+N+Msc: ACC_0 ;
+N+Msc: VOC_E ;
+N+Msc: LOC_IE ;
+N+Msc: LOC_U ;
+N+Msc: IST_EM ;

LEXICON HRAD_PL
+N+Msc: NOMPL_Y ;
+N+Msc: GENPL_U ;
+N+Msc: DATPL_UM ;
+N+Msc: ACCPL_Y ;
+N+Msc: VOCPL_Y ;
+N+Msc: LOCPL_ECH ;
+N+Msc: ISTPL_Y ;

LEXICON MUZ
MUZ_SG ;
MUZ_PL ;

LEXICON MUZ_SG
+N+Msc: NOM_0 ;
+N+Msc: GEN_E ;
+N+Msc: DAT_OVI ;
+N+Msc: DAT_I ;
+N+Msc: ACC_E ;
+N+Msc: VOC_I ;
+N+Msc: LOC_OVI ;
+N+Msc: LOC_I ;
+N+Msc: IST_EM ;

LEXICON MUZ_PL
+N+Msc: NOMPL_OVE ;
+N+Msc: NOMPL_I ;
+N+Msc: GENPL_U ;
+N+Msc: DATPL_UM ;
+N+Msc: ACCPL_E ;
+N+Msc: VOCPL_OVE ;
+N+Msc: VOCPL_I ;
+N+Msc: LOCPL_IICH ;
+N+Msc: ISTPL_I ;

LEXICON STROJ 
STROJ_SG ;
STROJ_PL ;

LEXICON STROJ_SG
+N+Msc: NOM_0 ;
+N+Msc: GEN_E ;
+N+Msc: DAT_I ;
+N+Msc: ACC_0 ;
+N+Msc: VOC_I ;
+N+Msc: LOC_I ;
+N+Msc: IST_EM ;

LEXICON STROJ_PL
+N+Msc: NOMPL_E ;
+N+Msc: GENPL_U ;
+N+Msc: DATPL_UM ;
+N+Msc: ACCPL_E ;
+N+Msc: VOCPL_E ;
+N+Msc: LOCPL_IICH ;
+N+Msc: ISTPL_I ;

LEXICON PREDSEDA
PREDSEDA_SG ;
PREDSEDA_PL ;

LEXICON PREDSEDA_SG
+N+Msc: NOM_A ;
+N+Msc: GEN_Y ;
+N+Msc: DAT_OVI ;
+N+Msc: ACC_U ;
+N+Msc: VOC_O ;
+N+Msc: LOC_OVI ;
+N+Msc: IST_OU ;

LEXICON PREDSEDA_PL
+N+Msc: NOMPL_OVE ;
+N+Msc: GENPL_U ;
+N+Msc: DATPL_UM ;
+N+Msc: ACCPL_Y ;
+N+Msc: VOCPL_OVE ;
+N+Msc: LOCPL_ECH ;
+N+Msc: ISTPL_Y ;

LEXICON SOUDCE
SOUDCE_SG ;
SOUDCE_PL ;

LEXICON SOUDCE_SG
+N+Msc: NOM_E ;
+N+Msc: GEN_E ;
+N+Msc: DAT_I ;
+N+Msc: ACC_E ;
+N+Msc: VOC_E ;
+N+Msc: LOC_OVI ;
+N+Msc: LOC_I ;
+N+Msc: IST_EM ;

LEXICON SOUDCE_PL
+N+Msc: NOMPL_OVE ;
+N+Msc: NOMPL_I ;
+N+Msc: GENPL_U ;
+N+Msc: DATPL_UM ;
+N+Msc: ACCPL_E ;
+N+Msc: VOCPL_OVE ;
+N+Msc: VOCPL_I ;
+N+Msc: LOCPL_IICH ;
+N+Msc: ISTPL_I ;

LEXICON LES 
LES_SG ;
HRAD_PL ;

LEXICON LES_SG
+N+Msc: NOM_0 ;
+N+Msc: GEN_A ;
+N+Msc: DAT_U ;
+N+Msc: ACC_0 ;
+N+Msc: VOC_E ;
+N+Msc: LOC_E ;
+N+Msc: LOC_U ;
+N+Msc: IST_EM ;

LEXICON ZAMEK
ZAMEK_SG ;
ZAMEK_PL ;

LEXICON ZAMEK_SG
+N+Msc: NOM_0 ;
+N+Msc: GEN_U ;
+N+Msc: DAT_U ;
+N+Msc: ACC_0 ;
+N+Msc: VOC_U ;
+N+Msc: LOC_U ;
+N+Msc: IST_EM ;

LEXICON ZAMEK_PL 
+N+Msc: NOMPL_Y ;
+N+Msc: GENPL_U ;
+N+Msc: DATPL_UM ;
+N+Msc: ACCPL_Y ;
+N+Msc: VOCPL_Y ;
+N+Msc: LOCPL_IICH ;
+N+Msc: ISTPL_Y ;

LEXICON DIVAK
DIVAK_SG ;
DIVAK_PL ;

LEXICON DIVAK_SG
+N+Msc: NOM_0 ;
+N+Msc: GEN_A ;
+N+Msc: DAT_OVI ;
+N+Msc: DAT_U ;
+N+Msc: ACC_A ;
+N+Msc: VOC_U ;
+N+Msc: LOC_OVI ;
+N+Msc: LOC_U ;
+N+Msc: IST_EM ;

LEXICON DIVAK_PL
+N+Msc: NOMPL_OVE ;
+N+Msc: NOMPL_I ;
+N+Msc: GENPL_U ;
+N+Msc: DATPL_UM ;
+N+Msc: ACCPL_Y ;
+N+Msc: VOCPL_OVE ;
+N+Msc: VOCPL_I ;
+N+Msc: LOCPL_IICH ;
+N+Msc: ISTPL_Y ;

LEXICON KOLEGA
PREDSEDA_SG ;
KOLEGA_PL ;

LEXICON KOLEGA_PL
+N+Msc: NOMPL_OVE ;
+N+Msc: GENPL_U ;
+N+Msc: DATPL_UM ;
+N+Msc: ACCPL_Y ;
+N+Msc: VOCPL_OVE ;
+N+Msc: LOCPL_IICH ;
+N+Msc: ISTPL_Y ;

LEXICON LIDE_PL
+N+Msc: NOMPL_EE ;
+N+Msc: GENPL_II ;
+N+Msc: DATPL_EM ;
+N+Msc: ACCPL_I ;
+N+Msc: VOCPL_EE ;
+N+Msc: LOCPL_ECH ;
+N+Msc: ISTPL_MI ;

! Feminine lexica
! ===============

LEXICON ZENA
ZENA_SG ;
ZENA_PL ;

LEXICON ZENA_SG
+N+Fem: NOM_A ;
+N+Fem: GEN_Y ;
+N+Fem: DAT_IE ;
+N+Fem: ACC_U ;
+N+Fem: VOC_O ;
+N+Fem: LOC_IE ;
+N+Fem: IST_OU ;

LEXICON ZENA_PL
+N+Fem: NOMPL_Y ;
+N+Fem: GENPL_0 ;
+N+Fem: DATPL_AM ;
+N+Fem: ACCPL_Y ;
+N+Fem: VOCPL_Y ;
+N+Fem: LOCPL_ACH ;
+N+Fem: ISTPL_AMI ;

LEXICON RUZE
RUZE_SG ;
RUZE_PL ;

LEXICON RUZE_SG
+N+Fem: NOM_E ;
+N+Fem: GEN_E ;
+N+Fem: DAT_I ;
+N+Fem: ACC_I ;
+N+Fem: VOC_E ;
+N+Fem: LOC_I ;
+N+Fem: IST_II ;

LEXICON RUZE_PL
+N+Fem: NOMPL_E ;
+N+Fem: GENPL_II ;
+N+Fem: DATPL_IIM ;
+N+Fem: ACCPL_E ;
+N+Fem: VOCPL_E ;
+N+Fem: LOCPL_IICH ;
+N+Fem: ISTPL_EMI ;

LEXICON PISEN 
PISEN_SG ;
RUZE_PL ;
LEXICON PISEN_SG
+N+Fem: NOM_0 ;
+N+Fem: GEN_E ;
+N+Fem: DAT_I ;
+N+Fem: ACC_0 ;
+N+Fem: VOC_I ;
+N+Fem: LOC_I ;
+N+Fem: IST_II ;

LEXICON KOST
KOST_SG ;
KOST_PL ;

LEXICON KOST_SG
+N+Fem: NOM_0 ;
+N+Fem: GEN_I ;
+N+Fem: DAT_I ;
+N+Fem: ACC_0 ;
+N+Fem: VOC_I ;
+N+Fem: LOC_I ;
+N+Fem: IST_II ;

LEXICON KOST_PL
+N+Fem: NOMPL_I ;
+N+Fem: GENPL_II ;
+N+Fem: DATPL_EM ;
+N+Fem: ACCPL_I ;
+N+Fem: VOCPL_I ;
+N+Fem: LOCPL_ECH ;
+N+Fem: ISTPL_MI ;

LEXICON SKOLA
SKOLA_SG ;
SKOLA_PL ;

LEXICON SKOLA_SG
+N+Fem: NOM_A ;
+N+Fem: GEN_Y ;
+N+Fem: DAT_E ;
+N+Fem: ACC_U ;
+N+Fem: VOC_O ;
+N+Fem: LOC_IE ;
+N+Fem: IST_OU ;

LEXICON SKOLA_PL
+N+Fem: NOMPL_Y ;
+N+Fem: GENPL_0 ;
+N+Fem: DATPL_AM ;
+N+Fem: ACCPL_Y ;
+N+Fem: VOCPL_Y ;
+N+Fem: LOCPL_ACH ;
+N+Fem: ISTPL_AMI ;

LEXICON RUKA_PL 
+N+Fem: GENPL_OU ;
+N+Fem: LOCPL_OU ;
+N+Fem: ISTPL_AMA ;

LEXICON PALICE
RUZE_SG ;
PALICE_PL ;

LEXICON PALICE_PL
+N+Fem: NOMPL_E ;
+N+Fem: GENPL_0 ;
+N+Fem: DATPL_IIM ;
+N+Fem: ACCPL_E ;
+N+Fem: VOCPL_E ;
+N+Fem: LOCPL_IICH ;
+N+Fem: ISTPL_EMI ;



! Neuter lexica
! =============

LEXICON MESTO
MESTO_SG ;
MESTO_PL ;

LEXICON MESTO_SG 
+N+Neu: NOM_O ;
+N+Neu: GEN_A ;
+N+Neu: DAT_U ; 
+N+Neu: ACC_O ;
+N+Neu: VOC_O ;
+N+Neu: LOC_IE ;
+N+Neu: LOC_U ;
+N+Neu: IST_EM ;

LEXICON MESTO_PL
+N+Neu: NOMPL_A ;
+N+Neu: GENPL_0 ;
+N+Neu: DATPL_UM ;
+N+Neu: ACCPL_A ;
+N+Neu: VOCPL_A ;
+N+Neu: LOCPL_ECH ;
+N+Neu: ISTPL_Y ;

LEXICON MORE
MORE_SG ;
MORE_PL ;

LEXICON MORE_SG
+N+Neu: NOM_E ; 
+N+Neu: GEN_E ; 
+N+Neu: DAT_I ; 
+N+Neu: ACC_E ; 
+N+Neu: VOC_E ;
+N+Neu: LOC_I ;
+N+Neu: IST_EM ;

LEXICON MORE_PL
+N+Neu: NOMPL_E ; 
+N+Neu: GENPL_II ; 
+N+Neu: DATPL_IIM ;
+N+Neu: ACCPL_E ;
+N+Neu: VOCPL_E ;
+N+Neu: LOCPL_IICH ;
+N+Neu: ISTPL_I ;

LEXICON KURE
KURE_SG ;
KURE_PL ;

LEXICON KURE_SG
+N+Neu: NOM_E ;
+N+Neu: GEN_ETE ;
+N+Neu: DAT_ETI ;
+N+Neu: ACC_E ;
+N+Neu: VOC_E ;
+N+Neu: LOC_ETI ;
+N+Neu: IST_EM ;

LEXICON KURE_PL
+N+Neu: NOMPL_ATA ;
+N+Neu: GENPL_AT ;
+N+Neu: DATPL_UM ;
+N+Neu: ACCPL_ATA ;
+N+Neu: VOCPL_ATA ;
+N+Neu: LOCPL_ATECH ;
+N+Neu: ISTPL_ATY ;

LEXICON STAVENI
STAVENI_SG ;
STAVENI_PL ;

LEXICON STAVENI_SG
+N+Neu: NOM_II ;
+N+Neu: GEN_II ;
+N+Neu: DAT_II ;
+N+Neu: ACC_II ;
+N+Neu: VOC_II ;
+N+Neu: LOC_II ;
+N+Neu: IST_IIM ;

LEXICON STAVENI_PL
+N+Neu: NOMPL_II ;
+N+Neu: GENPL_II ;
+N+Neu: DATPL_IIM ;
+N+Neu: ACCPL_II ;
+N+Neu: VOCPL_II ;
+N+Neu: LOCPL_IICH ;
+N+Neu: ISTPL_IIMI ;




! =============== !
! Noun declension !
! =============== !

! singular_declination
! --------------------

LEXICON NOM_0
+Sg+Nom: # ;

LEXICON NOM_A
+Sg+Nom:%>a # ;

LEXICON NOM_E
+Sg+Nom:%>e # ;

LEXICON NOM_O
+Sg+Nom:%>o # ; 

LEXICON NOM_II
+Sg+Nom:%>í # ;

LEXICON GEN_A
+Sg+Gen:%>a # ;

LEXICON GEN_U
+Sg+Gen:%>u # ;

LEXICON GEN_E
+Sg+Gen:%>e # ;

LEXICON GEN_I
+Sg+Gen:%>i # ; 

LEXICON GEN_ETE
+Sg+Gen:%>te # ;

LEXICON GEN_II
+Sg+Gen:%>í # ;

LEXICON GEN_Y
+Sg+Gen:%>y # ;

LEXICON DAT_E
+Sg+Dat:%>e # ;

LEXICON DAT_IE
+Sg+Dat:%>ě # ;

LEXICON DAT_OVI
+Sg+Dat:%>ovi # ;

LEXICON DAT_I
+Sg+Dat:%>i # ;

LEXICON DAT_II
+Sg+Dat:%>í # ;

LEXICON DAT_ETI
+Sg+Dat:%>eti # ;

LEXICON DAT_U
+Sg+Dat:%>u # ;

LEXICON ACC_E
+Sg+Acc:%>e # ;

LEXICON ACC_0
+Sg+Acc:%>0 # ;

LEXICON ACC_A
+Sg+Acc:%>a # ;

LEXICON ACC_I
+Sg+Acc:%>i # ;

LEXICON ACC_O
+Sg+Acc:%>o # ;

LEXICON ACC_II
+Sg+Acc:%>í # ;

LEXICON ACC_U
+Sg+Acc:%>u # ;

LEXICON VOC_U
+Sg+Voc:%>u # ;

LEXICON VOC_E
+Sg+Voc:%>e # ;

LEXICON VOC_I
+Sg+Voc:%>i # ;

LEXICON VOC_II
+Sg+Voc:%>í # ;

LEXICON VOC_O
+Sg+Voc:%>o # ;

LEXICON LOC_OVI
+Sg+Loc:%>ovi # ;

LEXICON LOC_I
+Sg+Loc:%>i # ;

LEXICON LOC_U
+Sg+Loc:%>u # ;

LEXICON LOC_E
+Sg+Loc:%>e # ;

LEXICON LOC_II
+Sg+Loc:%>í # ;

LEXICON LOC_ETI
+Sg+Loc:%>ti # ;

LEXICON LOC_IE
+Sg+Loc:%>ě # ;

LEXICON IST_EM
+Sg+Ins:%>em # ;

LEXICON IST_ETEM
+Sg+Ins:%>tem # ;

LEXICON IST_IIM
+Sg+Ins:%>ím # ;

LEXICON IST_OU
+Sg+Ins:%>ou # ;

LEXICON IST_II
+Sg+Ins:%>í # ;


! plural_declination
! ------------------

LEXICON NOMPL_OVE
+Pl+Nom:%>ové # ;

LEXICON NOMPL_EE
+Pl+Nom:%>é # ;

LEXICON NOMPL_I
+Pl+Nom:%>i # ;

LEXICON NOMPL_IE
+Pl+Nom:%>ě # ;

LEXICON NOMPL_Y
+Pl+Nom:%>y # ;

LEXICON NOMPL_E
+Pl+Nom:%>e # ;

LEXICON NOMPL_A
+Pl+Nom:%>a # ;

LEXICON NOMPL_ATA
+Pl+Nom:%>ata # ;

LEXICON NOMPL_II
+Pl+Nom:%>í # ;

LEXICON GENPL_U
+Pl+Gen:%>ů # ;

LEXICON GENPL_0
+Pl+Gen:%>  # ; 

LEXICON GENPL_II
+Pl+Gen:%>í # ;

LEXICON GENPL_AT
+Pl+Gen:%>at # ;

LEXICON GENPL_OU
+PL+Gen:%>ou # ;

LEXICON DATPL_UM
+Pl+Dat:%>ům # ;

LEXICON DATPL_ATUM
+Pl+Dat:%>atům # ;

LEXICON DATPL_AM
+Pl+Dat:%>ám # ; 

LEXICON DATPL_IIM
+Pl+Dat:%>ím # ;

LEXICON DATPL_EM
+Pl+Dat:%>em # ;

LEXICON ACCPL_Y
+Pl+Acc:%>y # ;

LEXICON ACCPL_A
+Pl+Acc:%>a # ;

LEXICON ACCPL_ATA
+Pl+Acc:%>ata # ;

LEXICON ACCPL_II
+Pl+Acc:%>í # ;

LEXICON ACCPL_E
+Pl+Acc:%>e # ;

LEXICON ACCPL_I
+Pl+Acc:%>i # ; 

LEXICON ACCPL_IE
+Pl+Acc:%>ě  # ; 

LEXICON VOCPL_IE
+Pl+Voc:%>ě  # ; 

LEXICON VOCPL_A
+Pl+Voc:%>a # ;

LEXICON VOCPL_ATA
+Pl+Voc:%>ata # ;

LEXICON VOCPL_II
+Pl+Voc:%>í # ;

LEXICON VOCPL_OVE
+Pl+Voc:%>ové # ;

LEXICON VOCPL_EE
+Pl+Voc:%>é # ;

LEXICON VOCPL_I
+Pl+Voc:%>i # ;

LEXICON VOCPL_Y
+Pl+Voc:%>y # ;

LEXICON VOCPL_E
+Pl+Voc:%>e # ;

LEXICON LOCPL_ECH
+Pl+Loc:%>ech # ;

LEXICON LOCPL_ATECH
+Pl+Loc:%>atech # ;

LEXICON LOCPL_IICH
+Pl+Loc:%>ích # ;

LEXICON LOCPL_ACH
+Pl+Loc:%>ách # ;

LEXICON LOCPL_OU
+Pl+Loc:%>ou # ;

LEXICON ISTPL_Y
+Pl+Ins:%>y # ;

LEXICON ISTPL_I
+Pl+Ins:%>i # ;

LEXICON ISTPL_EM
+Pl+Ins:%>em # ;

LEXICON ISTPL_AMI
+Pl+Ins:%>ami # ;

LEXICON ISTPL_EMI
+Pl+Ins:%>emi # ;

LEXICON ISTPL_MI
+Pl+Ins:%>mi # ;

LEXICON ISTPL_ATY
+Pl+Ins:%>aty # ;

LEXICON ISTPL_IIMI
+Pl+Ins:%>ími # ;

LEXICON ISTPL_AMA
+Pl+Ins:%>ama # ;
